Colorado, session 2026A, SB136.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-41-101, add (13) as
follows:
35-41-101. State board of stock inspection commissioners -
creation - brand commissioner - enterprise - bonds - lost or stolen
livestock reports - procedures.
(13) (a) THE BOARD AND THE DIVISION SHALL RECEIVE REPORTS OF
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

LOST OR STOLEN LIVESTOCK.
(b) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE DIVISION SHALL
IMPLEMENT PROCEDURES THAT:
(I) FACILITATE THE EFFICIENT COORDINATION WITH LAW
ENFORCEMENT RELATED TO REPORTS OF LOST OR STOLEN LIVESTOCK,
INCLUDING PROCEDURES THAT ENSURE THE REPORTING OF STOLEN
LIVESTOCK TO RELEVANT LAW ENFORCEMENT WITHIN TWENTY-FOUR HOURS
OF THE DIVISION RECEIVING A REPORT OF STOLEN LIVESTOCK, AND AFTER
THE DIVISION, UPON REVIEW OF THE REPORT, SUSPECTS THAT A LIVESTOCK
THEFT HAS OCCURRED; AND
(II) ENSURE THE PUBLIC IS NOTIFIED OF LOST OR STOLEN LIVESTOCK
THAT HAS BEEN REPORTED TO THE DIVISION.
(c) THE PROCEDURES IMPLEMENTED BY THE DIVISION PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (13)(b) OF THIS SECTION MAY VARY BY GEOGRAPHIC REGION OF
THE STATE DEPENDING ON THE REGION'S NEEDS.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-136

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-136